vi: Hệ thống giá gắn túi treo xe: Bắt bu-lông; Dây đàn hồi bungee; Móc kẹp; Khóa nhám; KlickFix; Hệ thống MIK; Đòn bẩy nhả nhanh; Trượt trên thanh ray; Gắn bằng dây đai; Móc đa năng; Khác
es: Sistema de montaje de las alforjas: Para atornillar; Cuerda elástica; Ganchos de clip; Correas de gancho y bucle; KlickFix; Sistema MIK; Palanca de liberación rápida; Riel de deslizamiento; Soporte con correa; Gancho universal; Otro
ko: 패니어 장착 시스템: 볼트온; 번지 코드; 클립온 훅; 벨크로 스트랩; KlickFix; MIK 시스템; 퀵 릴리스 레버; 슬라이드온 레일; 스트랩 마운트; 범용 훅; 기타
lt-LT: Krepšių tvirtinimo sistema: Prisukamas varžtais; Elastinė virvė; Užsegami kabliukai; Kontaktinės juostos; KlickFix; MIK sistema; Greitojo atleidimo svirtis; Užmaunamas bėgelis; Tvirtinamas dirželiais; Universalus kabliukas; Kita
hr-HR: Sustav montaže bisaga: Pričvršćivanje vijcima; Elastično uže; Uskočne kuke; Trake na čičak; KlickFix; Sustav MIK; Ručica za brzo otpuštanje; Klizna vodilica; Pričvršćivanje trakom; Univerzalna kuka; Ostalo
pl: System mocowania sakwy: Na śruby; Linka elastyczna (bungee); Zaczepy; Paski z rzepem; KlickFix; System MIK; Dźwignia z szybkozamykaczem; Wsuwane na szynę; Mocowanie na pasek; Uniwersalny hak; Inne
tr: Heybe montaj sistemi: Cıvatalı; Bungee kordonu; Klipsli kancalar; Cırt cırtlı kayışlar; KlickFix; MIK sistemi; Hızlı açılan mandal; Ray üzerine geçmeli; Kayış montajı; Evrensel kanca; Diğer
de: Gepäcktaschen-Befestigungssystem: Verschraubt; Spanngurt; Clip-on-Haken; Klettverschluss-Riemen; KlickFix; MIK-System; Schnellspannhebel; Schiebeschiene; Riemenbefestigung; Universalhaken; Sonstige
cs: Systém uchycení bočních brašen: Šroubovací; Pružné upínače; Zacvakávací háčky; Pásky na suchý zip; KlickFix; Systém MIK; Rychloupínací páčka; Nasouvací kolejnice; Upevnění pomocí popruhu; Univerzální háček; Jiné
hu: Oldaltáska rögzítési rendszere: Csavaros rögzítés; Gumipók; Felpattintható kampók; Tépőzáras pántok; KlickFix; MIK rendszer; Gyorszáras kar; Csúszósín; Pántos rögzítés; Univerzális kampó; Egyéb
zh-CN: 驮包安装系统: 螺栓固定; 弹力绳; 夹扣式挂钩; 魔术贴绑带; KlickFix; MIK 系统; 快速释放杆; 滑动导轨; 绑带安装; 通用挂钩; 其他
pt-BR: Alforjes, sistema de montagem: Parafusado; Corda elástica; Ganchos com clipe; Tiras de fita autocolante; KlickFix; Sistema MIK; Alavanca de liberação rápida; Trilho de encaixe; Montagem com tira; Gancho universal; Outro
sl-SI: Sistem za montažo potovalnih torb: Privijačeno; Elastična vrv; Kljukice za pripenjanje; Trakovi z ježkom; KlickFix; Sistem MIK; Ročica za hitro sprostitev; Drsna tirnica; Pritrditev s trakom; Univerzalna kljuka; Drugo
pt-PT: Sistema de fixação do alforge: Aparafusado; Corda elástica; Ganchos de mola; Tiras aderentes; KlickFix; Sistema MIK; Alavanca de libertação rápida; Calha deslizante; Montagem com correia; Gancho universal; Outro
en: Pannier mounting system: Bolt-on; Bungee cord; Clip-on hooks; Hook-and-loop straps; KlickFix; MIK system; Quick-release lever; Slide-on rail; Strap mount; Universal hook; Other
fr: Système de fixation pour sacoches: À boulonner; Cordon élastique; Crochets à clipser; Sangles auto-agrippantes; KlickFix; Système MIK; Levier de fixation rapide; Rail coulissant; Fixation par sangle; Crochet universel; Autre
it: Sistema di montaggio del borsone: Da avvitare; Corda elastica; Ganci a clip; Cinghie a strappo; KlickFix; Sistema MIK; Leva a sgancio rapido; Binario a scorrimento; Montaggio a cinghia; Gancio universale; Altro
sk-SK: Systém pripevnenia tašky na bicykel: Priskrutkovanie; Elastické lanko; Zacvakávacie háčiky; Pásiky so suchým zipsom; KlickFix; Systém MIK; Rýchloupínacia páčka; Nasúvacia koľajnička; Upevnenie pomocou popruhov; Univerzálny háčik; Iné
ru: Система крепления велосумок: На болтах; Эластичный шнур; Крючки-защелки; Ремешки на липучке; KlickFix; Система MIK; Быстросъемный рычаг; Скользящая направляющая; Крепление на ремнях; Универсальный крючок; Другое
bg-BG: Система за монтаж на дисаги: С болтове; С ластично въже; Закопчаващи се куки; Велкро ленти; KlickFix; Система MIK; Лост за бързо освобождаване; Плъзгаща се шина; С ремъци; Универсална кука; Друго
nb: Monteringssystem for sykkelveske: Fastskrudd; Bungee-snor; Klipskroker; Borrelåsstropper; KlickFix; MIK-system; Hurtigutløserspak; Skyveskinne; Stroppfeste; Universalkrok; Annet
el: Σύστημα τοποθέτησης καλαθιού: Βιδωτό; Ελαστικό κορδόνι; Άγκιστρα με κλιπ; Ιμάντες αυτοπρόσφυσης; KlickFix; Σύστημα MIK; Μοχλός γρήγορης απελευθέρωσης; Ράγα ολίσθησης; Τοποθέτηση με ιμάντα; Άγκιστρο γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
nl: Montagesysteem fietstas: Boutbevestiging; Elastiekkoord; Opklikhaken; Klittenband; KlickFix; MIK-systeem; Snelspanner; Schuifrail; Riembevestiging; Universele haak; Overig
ja: パニアマウントシステム: ボルトオン; バンジーコード; クリップオンフック; 面ファスナーストラップ; KlickFix; MIKシステム; クイックリリースレバー; スライドオンレール; ストラップマウント; ユニバーサルフック; その他
ro-RO: Sistem de montare al genților de portbagaj: Prindere în șuruburi; Corzi elastice; Cârlige cu prindere rapidă; Curele cu scai; KlickFix; Sistem MIK; Manetă de eliberare rapidă; Șină cu glisare; Prindere cu curea; Cârlig universal; Altele
zh-TW: 馬鞍袋安裝系統: 螺栓安裝; 彈力繩; 夾式掛鉤; 魔鬼氈綁帶; KlickFix; MIK 系統; 快拆快扣; 滑軌; 綁帶安裝; 通用掛鉤; 其他
th: ระบบติดตั้งกระเป๋าข้าง: ยึดด้วยน็อต; สายบันจี้; ตะขอแบบหนีบ; สายรัดตีนตุ๊กแก; KlickFix; ระบบ MIK; ก้านปลดเร็ว; รางเลื่อน; รัดด้วยสาย; ตะขออเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
sv: Infästningssystem för sidoväska: Bultmontering; Elastiskt rep; Klämkrokar; Kardborreband; KlickFix; MIK-system; Snabbkopplingsspak; Skjutskena; Remmontering; Universalkrok; Övrigt
da: Monteringssystem for cykeltaske: Boltmontering; Elastiksnor; Clip-on-kroge; Velcrostropper; KlickFix; MIK-system; Quick release-greb; Glideskinne; Stropmontering; Universalkrog; Andet
fi: Laukkujen kiinnitysjärjestelmä: Pultattava; Joustoköysi; Klipsikoukut; Tarranauhat; KlickFix; MIK-järjestelmä; Pikalinkku; Liukukisko; Hihnakiinnitys; Yleiskoukku; Muu